Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.190

Immunity from suit.

The director, members of the boards or commissions, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any disciplinary actions or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 2002 c 86 s 120.]